Utah statutes.
13-42-114.   Bond required -- Substitute.

(1)  Instead of the surety bond required by Section 13-42-113, a provider may deliver to the administrator, in the amount required by Subsection 13-42-113(2), and, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1)(c)(i), payable or available to this state and to individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt-management services from the provider, as their interests may appear, if the provider or its agent does not comply with this chapter:

(a)  a certificate of insurance:

(i)  issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least A or equivalent by a nationally recognized rating organization approved by the administrator; and

(ii)  with no deductible, or if the provider supplies a bond in the amount of $5,000, a deductible not exceeding $5,000;

(b)  a certificate of deposit issued or confirmed by a bank approved by the administrator, payable upon presentation of a certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its agent has not complied with this chapter; or

(c)  with the approval of the administrator:

(i)  an irrevocable letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a bank approved by the administrator, payable upon presentation of a certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its agent has not complied with this chapter; or

(ii)  bonds or other obligations of the United States or guaranteed by the United States or bonds or other obligations of this state or a political subdivision of this state, to be deposited and maintained with a bank approved by the administrator for this purpose.

(2)  If a provider furnishes a substitute pursuant to Subsection (1), the provisions of Subsections 13-42-113(1), (3), (4), and (5) apply to the substitute.

